test/src/morphology/N-koontsh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kǭņtš: # Noun 149 'eng /est kaas/fin' - full paradigm
     kǭņtš+N+Sg+Nom: kǭņtš
     kǭņtš+N+Sg+Gen: kǭnd
     kǭņtš+N+Sg+Par: kǭndtõ
     kǭņtš+N+Sg+Dat: kǭndõn
     kǭņtš+N+Sg+Ins: kǭndkõks
     kǭņtš+N+Sg+Ill: kǭndõ
     kǭņtš+N+Sg+Ela: kǭndstõ
     kǭņtš+N+Pl+Nom: kǭndõd
     kǭņtš+N+Pl+Gen: kǭndõd
     kǭņtš+N+Pl+Par: kǭņtši
     kǭņtš+N+Pl+Dat: kǭndõdõn
     kǭņtš+N+Pl+Ins: kǭndõdõks
     kǭņtš+N+Pl+Ill: kǭndiž
     kǭņtš+N+Pl+Ela: kǭndist
